Washington statutes.
RCW 14.08.340

Interpretation and construction.

This act shall be so interpreted and construed as to make uniform so far as possible the laws and regulations of this state and other states and of the government of the United States having to do with the subject of aeronautics.

[ 1945 c 182 s 17; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 2722-46.]